Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 6. Alaska Supplemental Education Loan Program.

Sec. 14.43.170.
Creation; purpose.

There is created the Alaska supplemental education loan program to provide postsecondary educational supplemental financial assistance. Supplemental financial assistance is available to qualified borrowers to assist with unmet costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution approved by the commission. The commission shall make the public aware of the Alaska supplemental education loan program to facilitate providing loans to as many eligible borrowers as possible.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 20 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in the second sentence, substituted “to qualified borrowers to assist with unmet costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution approved by the commission” for “only if the financial aid available through the AlaskAdvantage loan program is insufficient to cover the costs of attendance at a postsecondary institution or if the borrower does not qualify for financial aid under the federal guaranteed student loan program.”

Sec. 14.43.171.
Applicability of other laws.

The provisions of AS

14.43.120(b)

,

14.43.120(d)(4)

,

14.43.135

,

14.43.140

, and

14.43.145

—

14.43.160

apply to the loans made under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

as if the loans were made under those applicable provisions.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 21 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, substituted “AS

14.43.120(b)

,

14.43.120(d)(4)

” for “AS

14.43.120(d)(4)

,

14.43.122

”, deleted “,

14.43.164

,

14.43.166

, and

14.43.168

” preceding “apply to the loans” and made a stylistic change.

Sec. 14.43.172.
Eligibility.

For a borrower to be eligible for a loan under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

, the borrower must be, or be about to be, enrolled in a postsecondary institution on at least a half-time basis and must be

a resident of this state

attending or about to attend a postsecondary institution that has been approved by and has executed a program participation agreement with the commission; or

attending or about to attend an approved federal guaranteed student loan institution; or

physically present in this state and attending or about to attend a federal guaranteed student loan institution located in this state.

To meet the residency requirement of (a) of this section, the borrower must meet the standards set out in AS

14.43.162(b)

.

In addition to the provisions of (a) of this section, a borrower is eligible for a loan under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

if the borrower

is not delinquent in payment on a loan previously awarded by the commission;

at the time of application or loan disbursement, does not have a past due child support obligation established by court order or by the child support services agency under AS

25.27.160

—

25.27.220

;

has not, within the previous five years, had a loan discharged or written off by the commission for any reason;

does not have a status, at the time of application for a loan or disbursement of loan money, that would prevent the borrower from repaying the loan as it becomes due;

has not, within the previous five years, defaulted on another loan made to the borrower by a lending entity unless the borrower can show good faith efforts to repay the loan and extraordinary circumstances that led to the default;

has a credit history, at the time of application for a loan, that demonstrates an ability and willingness to pay an extension of credit or loan as it becomes due; and

has complied with the military selective service registration requirements imposed under 50 U.S.C. App. 453 (Military Selective Service Act), if those requirements were applicable to the person.

The commission may not make a loan to a borrower who has been in default on a loan previously awarded by the commission unless the previously awarded loan has been paid in full.

Notwithstanding (c)(4) — (6) of this section, the commission may make a loan to a borrower if another individual who satisfies the requirements of (c) of this section cosigns the loan.

The commission may withhold disbursement of a loan if the borrower no longer meets the eligibility standards set out in this section.

A borrower who is attending a postsecondary institution in this state that has been approved by the commission but is not an approved federal guaranteed student loan institution must also comply with and meet any other requirements established by the commission.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 2 ch 89 SLA 2002; am §§ 15, 16 ch 63 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2009; am §§ 22, 23 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement division” was changed to “child support services agency” in (c) of this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004, and to correct a manifest error.

Cross references. —

For provision prescribing the applicability of the 2009 amendment of (c) of this section to loans authorized by this section on or after July 1, 2009, see § 3, ch. 7, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.
For ability of the Alaska Student Loan Corporation to adopt emergency regulations under AS

44.62.250

to implement the 2009 amendment of (c) of this section to loans authorized by this section, see § 4, ch. 7, SLA 2009, in the 2009 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2009 amendment, effective May 1, 2009, in paragraph (c)(6), substituted “has” for “does not have” and “an ability and willingness” for “chronic inability or unwillingness”.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in (a), in (a)(1)(B), substituted “guaranteed student” for “family education” following “approved federal”, in (a)(2), substituted “a federal guaranteed student loan” for “an approved federal family education loan”; in (g), substituted “federal guaranteed student loan” for “federal family education loan”.

Editor's notes. —

Paragraph (c)(7) of this section refers to 50 U.S.C. App 453 which was renumbered in 2015 as 50 U.S.C. 3802 by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.

Sec. 14.43.173.
Loan award maximums; use of loan award.

In a school year, the corporation may finance a loan to an eligible borrower under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

attending an eligible postsecondary institution not to exceed

$14,000 to an eligible undergraduate student attending a college or university;

$15,000 to an eligible graduate student attending a college or university;

$10,000 to an eligible student attending a career education program.

The corporation may finance loans made under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

to a borrower in an amount that is not more than

a total of $56,000 for undergraduate study;

a total of $60,000 for graduate study; or

a combined total of $87,000 for undergraduate and graduate study.

To maintain a loan award under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

, the borrower must continue to be in good standing as determined by the institution and approved by the commission.

The commission shall determine a borrower’s loan award amount for a specific school year based on a student’s on-time, half-time, and full-time student status and may not exceed the limits established in this section or the borrower’s costs of attendance.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am §§ 24 — 26 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For family education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 7.

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, in the introductory language in (a) substituted “the corporation may finance” for “the commission may make”; in (a)(1), substituted “$14,000” for “$8,500”, in (a)(2), substituted “$15,000” for “$9,500”, in (a)(3), substituted “$10,000” for “$6,500”; in (b), at the beginning of the introductory language substituted “The corporation may finance” for “The commission may not award” and near the end of the introductory language, substituted “in an amount that is not more than” for “for more than”, in (b)(1), substituted “$56,000” for “$42,500”, in (b)(2), substituted “$60,000” for “$47,500”, in (b)(3), substituted “$87,000” for “$60,000”; added (d).

Sec. 14.43.174.
Interest. [Repealed, § 45 ch 89 SLA 2014.]

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Sec. 14.43.175.
Repayment of loans.

A borrower’s obligation to commence repayment of the principal of and interest on a loan under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

begins not more than six months following the borrower’s completion or other termination of the postsecondary program or the date that the borrower ceases to be enrolled on at least a half-time basis.

History.

(§ 29 ch 85 SLA 2001; am § 27 ch 89 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For supplemental education loan program, see 20 AAC 15, art. 9.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 17, 2014, inserted “not more than” following “begins”, deleted the second sentence, which read, “The commission shall set the repayment terms of a loan under AS

14.43.170

—

14.43.175

.”, and made a stylistic change.